Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-154
Rate change based on tax increases.

The commission shall approve the disposition of revenue resulting from decreases in federal or state income taxes or property taxes due to a tax law change that results in a reduction in the tax liability of a telecommunications company of twenty percent or more in any taxable year. Any telecommunications company so affected shall file a plan with the commission proposing the disposition of the revenue at the same time that it files its annual report with the commission. The commission shall schedule a public hearing within thirty days after the filing of the plan or the plan shall be deemed approved.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 53.